Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 79.
[PROPERTY TAX RELIEF].

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2005, No. 1242, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The Constitutional Issues Subcommittee of the House Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and a subcommittee of the Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs shall jointly conduct a study of property taxes relative to the impact of Amendments 59, 74, and 79 to the Arkansas Constitution.

“(b)

The subcommittees shall complete the study and make their findings and recommendations to the House Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Interim Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs by October 31, 2006.”

Publisher's Notes.

This amendment was proposed by H.J.R. 1015 during the 1999 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2000 general election by a vote of 502,882 for and 306,830 against.

This amendment was designated as Amendment 79 by the Secretary of State and was known as Amendment No. 2 on the general election ballot for 2000:

“An amendment to limit the increase in the assessed value of a taxpayer's real property after a countywide reappraisal and to require a property tax credit of at least three hundred dollars ($300) on homestead property.” The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Effective Dates.

Ark. Const. Amend. 79, § 4: Jan. 1, 2001.

§ 1. [Assessing value of real property].

After each county-wide reappraisal, as defined by law, and the resulting assessed value of property for ad valorum tax purposes and after each Tax Division appraisal and the resulting assessed value of utility and carrier real property for ad valorem tax purposes, the county assessor, or other official or officials designated by law, shall compare the assessed value of each parcel of real property reappraised or reassessed to the prior year's assessed value. If the assessed value of the parcel increased, then the assessed value of the parcel shall be adjusted pursuant to this section.

If the parcel is not a taxpayer's homestead used as the taxpayer's principal place of residence, then for the first assessment following reappraisal, any increase in the assessed value of the parcel shall be limited to not more than ten percent (10%) of the assessed value of the parcel for the previous year. In each year thereafter the assessed value shall increase by an additional ten percent (10%) of the assessed value of the parcel for the year prior to the first assessment that resulted from reappraisal but shall not exceed the assessed value determined by the reappraisal prior to adjustment under this subsection. For utility and carrier real property, any annual increase in the assessed value of the parcel shall be limited to not more than ten percent (10%) of the assessed value for the previous year.

This subsection (b) does not apply to newly discovered real property, new construction, or to substantial improvements to real property.

Except as provided in subsection (d), if the parcel is a taxpayer's homestead used as the taxpayer's principal place of residence then for the first assessment following reappraisal, any increase in the assessed value of the parcel shall be limited to not more than five percent (5%) of the assessed value of the parcel for the previous year. In each year thereafter the assessed value shall increase by an additional five percent (5%) of the assessed value of the parcel for the year prior to the first assessment that resulted from reappraisal but shall not exceed the assessed value determined by the reappraisal prior to adjustment under this subsection.

This subsection (c) does not apply to newly discovered real property, new construction, or to substantial improvements to real property.

A homestead used as the taxpayer's principal place of residence purchased or constructed on or after January 1, 2001 by a disabled person or by a person sixty-five (65) years of age or older shall be assessed thereafter based on the lower of the assessed value as of the date of purchase or construction or a later assessed value.

When a person becomes disabled or reaches sixty-five (65) years of age on or after January 1, 2001, that person's homestead used as the taxpayer's principal place of residence shall thereafter be assessed based on the lower of the assessed value on the person's sixty-fifth birthday, on the date the person becomes disabled or a later assessed value.

If a person is disabled or is at least sixty-five (65) years of age and owns a homestead used as the taxpayer's principal place of residence on January 1, 2001, the homestead shall be assessed based on the lower of the assessed value on January 1, 2001 or a later assessed value.

Residing in a nursing home shall not disqualify a person from the benefits of this subsection (d).

In instances of joint ownership, if one of the owners qualifies under this subsection (d), all owners shall receive the benefits of this amendment.

This subsection (d) does not apply to substantial improvements to real property.

For real property that is subject to Section 2 of this Amendment in lieu of January 1, 2001, the applicable date for this subsection (d) shall be January 1 of the year following the completion of the adjustments to assessed value required by Section 2.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 2. [Effect of county-wide reappraisal — Public utility and carrier exception].

Section 1 of this Amendment shall not be applicable to a county in which there has been no county-wide reappraisal, as defined by law, and resulting assessed value of property between January 1, 1986 and December 31, 2000. Real property in such a county shall be adjusted according to the provisions of this section.

Upon the completion of the adjustments to assessed value required by this section each taxpayer of that county shall be entitled to apply the provision of Section 1 of this Amendment to the real property owned by them.

The county assessor, or other official or officials designated by law, shall compare the assessed value of each parcel of real property to the prior year's assessed value. If assessed value of the parcel increased, then the assessed value of the parcel for the first assessment resulting from reappraisal shall be adjusted by adding one-third (1/3) of the increase to the assessed value of the parcel for the previous year. An additional one-third (1/3) of the increase shall be added in each of the next two (2) years. This adjustment procedure shall not apply to public utility and carrier property. Public utility and carrier property shall be adjusted pursuant to Section 1.

No adjustment shall be made for newly discovered real property, new construction, or to substantial improvements to real property.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 3. [Annual state credit].

The General Assembly shall provide by law for an annual state credit against ad valorem property tax on a homestead in an amount of not less than three hundred dollars ($300). The credit shall not exceed the amount of ad valorem property taxes owed. The credit shall apply beginning for taxes due in calendar year 2001. This section shall be applied in a manner that would not impair a bond holder's interest in ad valorem debt service revenues.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

§ 4. [Income adjustments — Personal property millage rate — Uniform property tax rate requirement — Reassessment — Rollback adjustments].

The General Assembly shall, by law, provide for procedures to be followed with respect to adjusting ad valorem taxes or millage pledged for bonded indebtedness purposes, to assure that the tax or millage levied for bonded indebtedness purposes will, at all times, provide a level of income sufficient to meet the current requirements of all principal, interest, paying agent fees, reserves, and other requirements of the bond indenture.

The millage rate levied against taxable personal property and utility and regulated carrier property in each taxing unit in the state shall be equal to the millage rate levied against real property in each taxing unit in the state. Personal property millage rates currently not equal to real estate millage rates shall be reduced to the level of the real estate millage rate; except to the extent necessary to provide a level of income sufficient to meet the current requirements of all principal, interest, paying agent fees, reserves, and other requirements of the bond indenture.

The provisions of this section shall not affect or repeal the required uniform rate of ad valorem property tax set forth in Amendment 74.

The General Assembly may, by law, prescribe the method and means for reassessing real property and establish the frequency of reassessment. However, reassessment shall occur at least once every five (5) years.

Rollback adjustments under Article 16, Section 14 shall be determined after the adjustments are made to assessed value under this Amendment.

Publisher's Notes.

The bracketed heading was added by the Publisher.

Cross References.

School tax, budget and approval of tax rate, Ark. Const. Amend. 74.